North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-01 State Department of Health
23-01-24.
Health care cost and quality review program — Penalty.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of health shall conduct a continuous program to review and improve the quality of health care in the state. The department may contract with a qualified person or organization to develop and implement the program. The department shall use the program to compile relevant information about the quality of health care in this state which will allow the department to evaluate the cost, quality, and outcomes of health care. The department shall establish and consult a provider advisory committee composed of health care providers regarding the data that is a cost-effective process for collecting and evaluating the information. The state health officer may assess against a provider a penalty of one hundred dollars per day for each day the provider willfully refuses to provide the department with information requested for use with the program, but the penalty may not exceed one thousand dollars for each request. A provider against whom a fee is assessed may appeal that assessment to the state health council. If the provider fails to pay the penalty, the health council may, in the county where the provider’s principal place of business is located, initiate a civil action against the provider to collect the penalty. As used in this section, “provider” means a person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or professional practice. The department shall ensure that patient privacy is protected throughout the compilation and use of the information. The department shall evaluate data management capabilities in the state and shall organize its capabilities to provide information about the cost of care on an individual provider basis as well as a collective basis.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 246, § 3.

23-01-24.
Health care cost and quality review program — Penalty.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall conduct a continuous program to review and improve the quality of health care in the state. The department may contract with a qualified person or organization to develop and implement the program. The department shall use the program to compile relevant information about the quality of health care in this state which will allow the department to evaluate the cost, quality, and outcomes of health care. The department shall establish and consult a provider advisory committee composed of health care providers regarding the data that is a cost-effective process for collecting and evaluating the information. The department may assess against a provider a penalty of one hundred dollars per day for each day the provider willfully refuses to provide the department with information requested for use with the program, but the penalty may not exceed one thousand dollars for each request. A provider against whom a fee is assessed may appeal that assessment to the department. If the provider fails to pay the penalty, the department may, in the county where the provider’s principal place of business is located, initiate a civil action against the provider to collect the penalty. As used in this section, “provider” means a person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or professional practice. The department shall ensure that patient privacy is protected throughout the compilation and use of the information. The department shall evaluate data management capabilities in the state and shall organize its capabilities to provide information about the cost of care on an individual provider basis as well as a collective basis.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 246, § 3; 2021, ch. 352, § 120, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-25.
Commercial feed, insecticide, fungicide, rodenticide, fertilizer, and soil conditioner laws — Laboratory function.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any laboratory test or analysis required under chapter 4.1-34, 4.1-40, or 4.1-41 must be performed by the state department of health for the agriculture commissioner at no charge.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 219, § 51; 2017, ch. 67, § 12, effective July 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 68, § 9, effective July 1, 2017.

23-01-25.
Commercial feed, insecticide, fungicide, rodenticide, fertilizer, and soil conditioner laws — Laboratory function.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any laboratory test or analysis required under chapter 4.1-34, 4.1-40, or 4.1-41 must be performed by the department of health and human services for the agriculture commissioner at no charge.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 219, § 51; 2017, ch. 67, § 12, effective July 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 68, § 9, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 121, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-26.
State department of health — Indirect cost recoveries.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Notwithstanding section 54-44.1-15, the state department of health may deposit indirect cost recoveries in its operating account.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 4, § 7.

23-01-26.
Department — Indirect cost recoveries.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

Notwithstanding section 54-44.1-15, the department of health and human services may deposit indirect cost recoveries in its operating account.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 4, § 7; 2021, ch. 352, § 122, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-27.
Donated dental services program.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall contract with the North Dakota dental association, or other appropriate and qualified organizations, to develop and administer a donated dental services program through which volunteer dentists provide comprehensive dental care for needy, disabled, aged, or medically compromised individuals. The volunteers will treat individuals through the program and, with the exception of certain dental laboratory costs, will fully donate their services and supplies. The contract must specify the responsibilities of the administering organization and include:

Establishment of a network of volunteer dentists, including dental specialists, volunteer dental laboratories, and other appropriate volunteer professionals to donate dental services to eligible individuals;

Establishment of a system to refer eligible individuals to appropriate volunteers;

Development and implementation of a public awareness campaign to educate eligible individuals about the availability of the program;

Provision of appropriate administrative and technical support to the program; and

Submission of an annual report to the state department of health that:

Accounts for all program funds;

Reports the number of individuals served by the program and the number of dentists and dental laboratories participating as providers in the program;

Includes any other information required by the state department of health; and

Performs, as required by the state department of health, any other duty relating to the program.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 29, § 12.

23-01-27.
Donated dental services program.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall contract with the North Dakota dental association, or other appropriate and qualified organizations, to develop and administer a donated dental services program through which volunteer dentists provide comprehensive dental care for needy, disabled, aged, or medically compromised individuals. The volunteers will treat individuals through the program and, with the exception of certain dental laboratory costs, will fully donate their services and supplies. The contract must specify the responsibilities of the administering organization and include:

Establishment of a network of volunteer dentists, including dental specialists, volunteer dental laboratories, and other appropriate volunteer professionals to donate dental services to eligible individuals;

Establishment of a system to refer eligible individuals to appropriate volunteers;

Development and implementation of a public awareness campaign to educate eligible individuals about the availability of the program;

Provision of appropriate administrative and technical support to the program; and

Submission of an annual report to the department of health and human services that:

Accounts for all program funds;

Reports the number of individuals served by the program and the number of dentists and dental laboratories participating as providers in the program;

Includes any other information required by the department of health and human services; and

Performs, as required by the department of health and human services, any other duty relating to the program.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 29, § 12; 2021, ch. 352, § 123, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-28.
Combined purchasing with local public health units — Continuing appropriation.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may make combined or joint purchases with or on behalf of local public health units for items or services. Payments received by the state department of health from local public health units pursuant to a combined or joint purchase must be deposited in the operating fund and are appropriated as a standing and continuing appropriation to the state department of health for the purpose of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 4, § 10.

23-01-28.
Combined purchasing with local public health units — Continuing appropriation.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may make combined or joint purchases with or on behalf of local public health units for items or services. Payments received by the department of health and human services from local public health units pursuant to a combined or joint purchase must be deposited in the operating fund and are appropriated as a standing and continuing appropriation to the department of health and human services for the purpose of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 4, § 10; 2021, ch. 352, § 124, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-29.
Bone marrow donor education.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall provide information and educational materials to the public regarding bone marrow donation through the national marrow donor program. The department shall seek assistance from the national marrow donor program to establish a system to distribute materials, ensure that the materials are updated periodically, and address the education and recruitment of minority populations.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 476, § 1.

23-01-29.
Bone marrow donor education.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall provide information and educational materials to the public regarding bone marrow donation through the national marrow donor program. The department shall seek assistance from the national marrow donor program to establish a system to distribute materials, ensure that the materials are updated periodically, and address the education and recruitment of minority populations.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 476, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 125, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-30.
Zoning regulation of concentrated animal feeding operations — Central repository. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 109, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

23-01-31.
North Dakota health information technology steering committee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 519, § 6.

23-01-32.
Viral hepatitis program — Vaccination — Study.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall establish and administer a viral hepatitis program with the goal of distributing to residents of the state who are at an increased risk for exposure to viral hepatitis information that addresses the higher incidence of hepatitis C exposure and infection among these populations, addresses the dangers presented by the disease, and provides contacts for additional information and referrals.

The department shall establish a list of classes of individuals by category that are at increased risk for viral hepatitis exposure. The list must be consistent with recommendations developed by the federal centers for disease control and prevention. The department shall determine the type of information the department will distribute under the program and the form and manner of distribution.

The department shall establish a vaccination and testing program, to be coordinated by the department through local public health units.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 231, § 1.

23-01-32.
Viral hepatitis program — Vaccination — Study.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish and administer a viral hepatitis program with the goal of distributing to residents of the state who are at an increased risk for exposure to viral hepatitis information that addresses the higher incidence of hepatitis C exposure and infection among these populations, addresses the dangers presented by the disease, and provides contacts for additional information and referrals.

The department shall establish a list of classes of individuals by category that are at increased risk for viral hepatitis exposure. The list must be consistent with recommendations developed by the federal centers for disease control and prevention. The department shall determine the type of information the department will distribute under the program and the form and manner of distribution.

The department shall establish a vaccination and testing program, to be coordinated by the department through local public health units.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 231, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 126, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-33.
Human papilloma virus — Information.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall educate the public about the human papilloma virus and the availability of a human papilloma virus vaccine; promote immunization against the human papilloma virus; and distribute informational material regarding the human papilloma virus and the human papilloma virus vaccine. The department shall distribute the informational material through relevant department programs and divisions, including breast and cervical cancer control programs; immunization programs; family planning programs; and human immunodeficiency virus and sexually transmitted disease programs. Informational materials distributed must include the recommendations of the advisory committee on immunization practices of the federal centers for disease control and prevention; contain information relevant to the target populations of each of the participating programs and divisions distributing the informational material; and contain information regarding the availability of the vaccine through the vaccines for children program operated by the department under 42 U.S.C. 1396s, and the medical assistance program.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 232, § 1.

23-01-33.
Human papilloma virus — Information.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall educate the public about the human papilloma virus and the availability of a human papilloma virus vaccine; promote immunization against the human papilloma virus; and distribute informational material regarding the human papilloma virus and the human papilloma virus vaccine. The department shall distribute the informational material through relevant department programs and divisions, including breast and cervical cancer control programs; immunization programs; family planning programs; and human immunodeficiency virus and sexually transmitted disease programs. Informational materials distributed must include the recommendations of the advisory committee on immunization practices of the federal centers for disease control and prevention; contain information relevant to the target populations of each of the participating programs and divisions distributing the informational material; and contain information regarding the availability of the vaccine through the vaccines for children program operated by the department under 42 U.S.C. 1396s, and the medical assistance program.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 232, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 127, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-34.
Children with special health care needs — Program administration.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall administer programs for children with special health care needs as may be necessary to conform to title 5, part 2, of the federal Social Security Act, as amended through July 1, 2007 [Pub. L. 74-271; 49 Stat. 620; 42 U.S.C. 701 et seq.], including providing services and assistance to children with special health care needs and their families and developing and operating clinics for the identification, screening, referral, and treatment of children with special health care needs.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 39, § 15.

23-01-34.
Children with special health care needs — Program administration.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall administer programs for children with special health care needs as may be necessary to conform to title 5, part 2, of the federal Social Security Act, as amended through July 1, 2007 [Pub. L. 74-271; 49 Stat. 620; 42 U.S.C. 701 et seq.], including providing services and assistance to children with special health care needs and their families and developing and operating clinics for the identification, screening, referral, and treatment of children with special health care needs.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 39, § 15; 2021, ch. 352, § 128, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-35.
Tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implants, or scarification — Permit — Fee — Adoption of rules — Exemptions — Injury reports.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

A person may not operate a facility providing tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implant, or scarification services without a permit issued by the department under this section. The holder of a permit shall display the permit in a conspicuous place at the facility for which the permit is issued. A permit issued under this section expires annually. An applicant for a permit shall submit an application for a permit to the department, on a form provided by the department, with a permit fee established by the department. The application must include the name and complete mailing address and street address of the facility and any other information reasonably required by the department for the administration of this section.

The health council shall adopt rules to regulate any person that receives compensation for engaging in the practice of tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implants, or scarification. The rules must establish health and safety requirements and limitations with respect to the age of an individual who may receive a tattoo, body piercing, or scarification and may prohibit any practice that the health council deems unsafe or a threat to public health.

A facility is exempt from subsection 1 if the facility provides body piercing that is limited to the piercing of the noncartilaginous perimeter or lobe of the ear and the facility does not provide tattooing, branding, scarification, or subdermal implants. A person is exempt from regulation under subsection 2 if the person’s practice under this section is limited to piercing of the noncartilaginous perimeter or lobe of the ear. A licensed health care professional acting within that professional’s scope of practice and the associated medical facility are exempt from this section.

If a customer of a facility regulated under this section reports to the facility an injury the customer or operator of the facility believes to have resulted from the tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implanting, or scarification provided at the facility, the operator of the facility shall provide the customer with written information on how to report the alleged injury to the state department of health. If a licensed health care professional treats a patient for an injury the professional determines, in the exercise of professional judgment, occurred as a result of a service regulated under this section, the professional shall report the circumstances to the state department of health. A licensed health care professional is immune from liability for making or not making a report under this subsection.

The fees established by the department must be based on the cost of conducting routine and complaint inspections and enforcement actions and preparing and sending license renewals. Fees collected under this section must be deposited in the department’s operating fund in the state treasury and any expenditure from the fund is subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly. The department shall waive all or a portion of the fee for any facility that is subject to local jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 233, § 1; 2007, ch. 133, § 2.

Collateral References.

Regulation of Business of Tattooing. 67 A.L.R.6th 395.

23-01-35.
Tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implants, or scarification — Permit — Fee — Adoption of rules — Exemptions — Injury reports.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

A person may not operate a facility providing tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implant, or scarification services without a permit issued by the department under this section. The holder of a permit shall display the permit in a conspicuous place at the facility for which the permit is issued. A permit issued under this section expires annually. An applicant for a permit shall submit an application for a permit to the department, on a form provided by the department, with a permit fee established by the department. The application must include the name and complete mailing address and street address of the facility and any other information reasonably required by the department for the administration of this section.

The department of health and human services shall adopt rules to regulate any person that receives compensation for engaging in the practice of tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implants, or scarification. The rules must establish health and safety requirements and limitations with respect to the age of an individual who may receive a tattoo, body piercing, or scarification and may prohibit any practice that the department of health and human services deems unsafe or a threat to public health.

A facility is exempt from subsection 1 if the facility provides body piercing that is limited to the piercing of the noncartilaginous perimeter or lobe of the ear and the facility does not provide tattooing, branding, scarification, or subdermal implants. A person is exempt from regulation under subsection 2 if the person’s practice under this section is limited to piercing of the noncartilaginous perimeter or lobe of the ear. A licensed health care professional acting within that professional’s scope of practice and the associated medical facility are exempt from this section.

If a customer of a facility regulated under this section reports to the facility an injury the customer or operator of the facility believes to have resulted from the tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implanting, or scarification provided at the facility, the operator of the facility shall provide the customer with written information on how to report the alleged injury to the department of health and human services. If a licensed health care professional treats a patient for an injury the professional determines, in the exercise of professional judgment, occurred as a result of a service regulated under this section, the professional shall report the circumstances to the department of health and human services. A licensed health care professional is immune from liability for making or not making a report under this subsection.

The fees established by the department must be based on the cost of conducting routine and complaint inspections and enforcement actions and preparing and sending license renewals. Fees collected under this section must be deposited in the department’s operating fund in the state treasury and any expenditure from the fund is subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly. The department shall waive all or a portion of the fee for any facility that is subject to local jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 233, § 1; 2007, ch. 133, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 129, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-36.
Appeal from permit proceedings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 280, § 2; 2015, ch. 192, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 199, § 74, effective April 29, 2019.

23-01-37.
Survey program — Health facilities construction or renovation projects — Innovation waivers — Continuing appropriation.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall conduct a life safety survey process for all health facilities licensed by the division of health facilities of the state department of health during and at the conclusion of a construction, renovation, or construction and renovation project.

In conducting a survey under this section, if the department uses a third party to review construction and renovation plans, the licensed provider shall negotiate and approve the price of the review services, the department shall contract with the third party, and the licensed provider shall pay the department for the review services.

The department shall deposit in the department’s operating account any payments received from a licensed provider under subdivision a. There is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis any funds deposited under subdivision a for the purpose of paying a third-party reviewer.

The department may charge a reasonable fee for the review of plans for construction, renovation, or construction and renovation projects performed under this section based on the size of the project. Revenues derived from the fees collected under this subsection must be deposited in the department’s operating fund in the state treasury.

The state department of health shall make an initial determination on a construction, renovation, or construction and renovation project of:

No more than one million dollars within twenty-eight days of receipt of a complete application;

More than one million dollars but no more than four million dollars within forty-two days of receipt of a complete application; and

More than four million dollars within fifty-six days of receipt of a complete application.

Following an initial determination under subsection 3, the state department of health shall make any followup determination on a construction, renovation, or construction and renovation project within fourteen days of receipt of the licensed provider’s response to the initial determination.

The state department of health may approve a request for a waiver of a state law or rule relating to an innovative construction, renovation, or construction and renovation project if the lack of compliance does not adversely affect health or safety.

The department shall design and operate the program in a manner that will provide that the surveyor that performs a life safety survey under this section does not violate the federal requirements associated with Medicare-certified life safety surveys.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 213, § 1; 2019, ch. 206, § 1, effective May 2, 2019; 2021, ch. 194, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 23-01-37 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 194, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2241; and Section 130 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

23-01-37.
Survey program — Health facilities construction or renovation projects — Innovation waivers — Continuing appropriation.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall conduct a life safety survey process for all health facilities licensed by the division of health facilities of the department of health and human services during and at the conclusion of a construction, renovation, or construction and renovation project.

In conducting a survey under this section, if the department uses a third party to review construction and renovation plans, the licensed provider shall negotiate and approve the price of the review services, the department shall contract with the third party, and the licensed provider shall pay the department for the review services.

The department shall deposit in the department’s operating account any payments received from a licensed provider under subdivision a. There is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis any funds deposited under subdivision a for the purpose of paying a third-party reviewer.

The department may charge a reasonable fee for the review of plans for construction, renovation, or construction and renovation projects performed under this section based on the size of the project. Revenues derived from the fees collected under this subsection must be deposited in the department’s operating fund in the state treasury.

The department of health and human services shall make an initial determination on a construction, renovation, or construction and renovation project of:

No more than one million dollars within twenty-eight days of receipt of a complete application;

More than one million dollars but no more than four million dollars within forty-two days of receipt of a complete application; and

More than four million dollars within fifty-six days of receipt of a complete application.

Following an initial determination under subsection 3, the department of health and human services shall make any followup determination on a construction, renovation, or construction and renovation project within fourteen days of receipt of the licensed provider’s response to the initial determination.

The department of health and human services may approve a request for a waiver of a state law or rule relating to an innovative construction, renovation, or construction and renovation project if the lack of compliance does not adversely affect health or safety.

The department shall design and operate the program in a manner that will provide that the surveyor that performs a life safety survey under this section does not violate the federal requirements associated with Medicare-certified life safety surveys.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 213, § 1; 2019, ch. 206, § 1, effective May 2, 2019; 2021, ch. 194, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 130, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01-38.
Electronic drug prior authorization and transmission — Limitations.

Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, effective August 1, 2015, a drug prior authorization request must be accessible to a health care provider with the provider’s electronic prescribing software system and must be accepted electronically, through a secure electronic transmission, by the payer, by the insurance company, or by the pharmacy benefit manager responsible for implementing or adjudicating or for implementing and adjudicating the authorization or denial of the prior authorization request. For purposes of this section, a facsimile is not an electronic transmission. The requirements in this section do not apply to workforce safety and insurance.

Effective August 1, 2013, electronic transmission devices used to communicate a prescription to a pharmacist may not use any means or permit any other person to use any means, including advertising, commercial messaging, and popup advertisements, to influence or attempt to influence through economic incentives the prescribing decision of a prescribing practitioner at the point of care. Such means may not be triggered by or be in specific response to the input, selection, or act of a prescribing practitioner or the prescribing practitioner’s staff in prescribing a certain pharmaceutical or directing a patient to a certain pharmacy. Any electronic communication sent to the prescriber, including advertising, commercial messaging, or popup advertisements must be consistent with the product label, supported by scientific evidence, and meet the federal food and drug administration requirements for advertising pharmaceutical products.

Electronic prescribing software may show information regarding a payer’s formulary if the software is not designed to preclude or make more difficult the act of a prescribing practitioner or patient selecting any particular pharmacy or pharmaceutical.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 183, § 1; 2013, ch. 204, § 1.

23-01-39.
Immunization program — Provider choice — Purchasing.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Department” means the state department of health.

“North Dakota immunization advisory committee” means the group of private health care providers, local public health units, department staff, and other applicable individuals which makes immunization and vaccine selection recommendations to the North Dakota immunization program.

“North Dakota immunization program” means the program administered by the department to provide vaccinations to North Dakota children consistent with state and federal law.

“Program-eligible child” means any child, who is under nineteen years of age, whose custodial parent or legal guardian resides in this state.

“Vaccine” means any vaccine recommended by the federal advisory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease control and prevention.

“Vaccines for children program” is a federally funded program that provides vaccines at no cost to eligible children pursuant to section 1928 of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396s].

As part of the North Dakota immunization program:

The department shall implement a provider choice system as part of the state’s implementation of the vaccines for children program. This provider choice system must provide a health care provider participating in the state’s vaccines for children program or in any other immunization program for children, adolescents, or adults which is administered through the state using federal or state funds, may select any licensed vaccine, including combination vaccines, and any dosage forms that have in effect a recommendation from the federal advisory committee on immunization practices. This subsection does not apply in the event of a shortage or delay in vaccine availability, disaster, public health emergency, terrorist attack, hostile military or paramilitary action, or extraordinary law enforcement emergency.

The department may establish a program through which the department purchases vaccines through the federal vaccine purchasing contract.

The department shall supply public health units with the purchased vaccines. A public health unit that receives vaccines under this subdivision shall administer the vaccines to program-eligible children.

A public health unit that receives vaccines under this purchasing program may not bill an insurer for the cost of the vaccine but may charge an administration fee.

The department shall fund this purchasing program through participation in the vaccines for children program, the federal section 317 vaccine program, and state funds appropriated for this purpose. If it appears there will be inadequate funds to fund this purchasing program, the department shall petition the emergency commission for a transfer from the state contingency fund. The emergency commission may grant the transfer request, or so much thereof as may be necessary, to fund this purchasing program.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 182, § 2; 2017, ch. 186, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

23-01-39.
Immunization program — Provider choice — Purchasing.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“North Dakota immunization advisory committee” means the group of private health care providers, local public health units, department staff, and other applicable individuals which makes immunization and vaccine selection recommendations to the North Dakota immunization program.

“North Dakota immunization program” means the program administered by the department to provide vaccinations to North Dakota children consistent with state and federal law.

“Program-eligible child” means any child, who is under nineteen years of age, whose custodial parent or legal guardian resides in this state.

“Vaccine” means any vaccine recommended by the federal advisory committee on immunization practices of the centers for disease control and prevention.

“Vaccines for children program” is a federally funded program that provides vaccines at no cost to eligible children pursuant to section 1928 of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396s].

As part of the North Dakota immunization program:

The department shall implement a provider choice system as part of the state’s implementation of the vaccines for children program. This provider choice system must provide a health care provider participating in the state’s vaccines for children program or in any other immunization program for children, adolescents, or adults which is administered through the state using federal or state funds, may select any licensed vaccine, including combination vaccines, and any dosage forms that have in effect a recommendation from the federal advisory committee on immunization practices. This subsection does not apply in the event of a shortage or delay in vaccine availability, disaster, public health emergency, terrorist attack, hostile military or paramilitary action, or extraordinary law enforcement emergency.

The department may establish a program through which the department purchases vaccines through the federal vaccine purchasing contract.

The department shall supply public health units with the purchased vaccines. A public health unit that receives vaccines under this subdivision shall administer the vaccines to program-eligible children.

A public health unit that receives vaccines under this purchasing program may not bill an insurer for the cost of the vaccine but may charge an administration fee.

The department shall fund this purchasing program through participation in the vaccines for children program, the federal section 317 vaccine program, and state funds appropriated for this purpose. If it appears there will be inadequate funds to fund this purchasing program, the department shall petition the emergency commission for a transfer from the state contingency fund. The emergency commission may grant the transfer request, or so much thereof as may be necessary, to fund this purchasing program.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 182, § 2; 2017, ch. 186, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 131, effective September 1, 2022.